apertium-scn.scn.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ǎaáàăắâåäãąāảạæbḃcćčċçdḋđḍðeéèĕêếễěëėęēəfgğĝǧġhħḥḫii̇íìĭîǐïĩīịıjkḱlłḻmnńňṅṇŋñoóòŏôốồộǒöőõøōớɔœpqrŕřŗṛṝsśšṡşṣßtţṭuúùŭûǔüũūưứvwxyýÿỹzźžżẓþAÁÀĂẮÂǍÅÄÃĄĀẢẠÆBḂCĆČĊÇDḊĐḌÐEÉÈĔÊẾỄĚËĖĘĒƏFGĞĜǦĠHĦḤḪIİÍÌĬÎǏÏĨĪỊIJKḰLŁḺMNŃŇṄṆŊÑOÓÒŎÔỐỒỘǑÖŐÕØŌỚƆŒPQRŔŘŖṚṜSŚŠṠŞṢSSTŢṬUÚÙŬÛǓÜŨŪƯỨVWXYÝŸỸZŹŽŻẒÞ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="v2" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="top" /> 
    <sdef n="quot" /> 
    <sdef n="rquot" /> 
    <sdef n="lquot" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" c="Gerundium"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitivus"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerundium"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" c="Participium"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" c="Praesens Indicativus"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" c="Perfectum Indicativus"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" c="Imperfectum Indicativus"/> 
    <sdef n="ifi" c="Perfectum Indicativus"/> 
    <sdef n="fti" c="Futurum Indicativus"/> 
    <sdef n="cni" c="Condicional Indicativus"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" c="Praesens Coniunctivus"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" c="Imperfectum Coniunctivus"/> 
    <sdef n="fts" c="Futurum Coniunctivus"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperativus"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->
<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <!--      <re>(www.|http://|https://|ftp://)[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-./]+[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9/]</re> --><re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="symbols">

  <e>       <p><l>%</l>     <r>%<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>%</l> <r>%<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>°</l><r>°<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>º</l><r>°<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>º</l><r>°<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l><b/>°C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>°C</l>    <r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>ºC</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ºC</l>    <r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>°<b/>C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>º<b/>C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>º<b/>C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


    <pardef n="ordinales">
        <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>èsimu</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>èsima</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>èsimi</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-èsimu</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-èsima</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-èsimi</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="numeros">
 <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
 <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><par n="symbols"/></e>
<!--        <e><re>[0-9]+([.',][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>-->
        <e><re>[0-9]+([.',][0-9]+)+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
        <e><p><l>"</l><r>"<s n="quot"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>«</l><r>«<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>»</l><r>»<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initialisms">
        <e w="2.0"><re>[BCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXYZ][BCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXYZ]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
        <e w="2.0"><re>[AEIOUBCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXYZ][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
        <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
        <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
        <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
        <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Orthographic -->

    <pardef n="gu/v/u">
      	<e><p><l>gu</l><r>gu</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>v</l><r>gu</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r>gu</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/gi/i">
      	<e><p><l>j</l><r>j</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>gi</l><r>j</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="j/i">
      	<e><p><l>j</l><r>j</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c/g">
      	<e><p><l>c</l><r>c</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>g</l><r>c</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n/nn">
      	<e><p><l>n</l><r>n</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>nn</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e/i">
      	<e><p><l>e</l><r>e</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a/e">
      	<e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="u/a/o">
      	<e><p><l>u</l><r>u</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>u</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="di/de">
      	<e><p><l>di</l><r>di</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>de</l><r>di</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø/i">
      	<e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø/i/'">
      	<e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>'</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ò/o">
      	<e><p><l>ò</l><r>ò</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>ò</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="o/u">
      	<e><p><l>o</l><r>o</r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cuvernu"><par n="c/g"/><i>uvern</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuvèrnu" r="LR"><par n="c/g"/><p><l>uvèrn</l><r>uvern</r></p><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guerra"><par n="gu/v/u"/><i>err</i><par n="cas/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="òmini"><par n="ò/o"/><i>mini</i><par n="@__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aducazzioni"><par n="a/e"/><i>ducaz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nimicu"><par n="n/nn"/><i>imic</i><par n="nimic/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stitutu"><par n="ø/i/'"/><i>stitut</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="òrbita"><par n="ò/o"/><i>rbit</i><par n="cas/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omusissualitati"><par n="o/u"/><i>musissualit</i><par n="cit/ati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="òspiti"><par n="ò/o"/><i>spiti</i><par n="patri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ussirvazzioni"><par n="u/a/o"/><i>ssirvaz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uccupazzioni"><par n="u/a/o"/><i>ccupaz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="justificazzioni"><par n="j/gi/i"/><i>ustificaz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juncu"><par n="j/i"/><i>unc</i><par n="parc/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="òstraca"><par n="ò/o"/><i>strac</i><par n="ripùbbric/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="junciu"><par n="j/i"/><i>unc</i><par n="sacchegg/iu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jucaloru"><par n="j/i"/><i>ucalor</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jussu"><par n="j/i"/><i>uss</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jucaturi"><par n="j/gi/i"/><i>ucaturi</i><par n="patri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jurnateri"><par n="j/i"/><i>urnateri</i><par n="patri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jugu"><par n="j/gi/i"/><i>ug</i><par n="parc/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="difinistrazzioni"><par n="di/de"/><i>finistraz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ndustrializzazzioni"><par n="ø/i/'"/><i>ndustrializzaz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostintazzioni"><par n="o/u"/><i>stintaz</i><par n="pupulaz/zioni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ntirissamentu"><par n="ø/i/'"/><i>ntirissament</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="difinsura"><par n="di/de"/><i>finsur</i><par n="cas/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onuri"><par n="o/u"/><i>nuri</i><par n="patri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="òrganu"><par n="ò/o"/><i>rgan</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="ospitati"><par n="o/u"/><i>spit</i><par n="cit/ati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nternu"><par n="ø/i"/><i>ntern</i><par n="bedd/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nternazziunali" r="LR"><par n="ø/i"/><p><l>ntirnazzionali</l><r>nternazziunali</r></p><par n="duci__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ntilliggenti"><par n="ø/i/'"/><i>ntilliggenti</i><par n="duci__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nteru"><par n="ø/i/'"/><i>nter</i><par n="bedd/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="orgogliusu"><par n="o/u"/><i>rgoglius</i><par n="bedd/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="difinitivamenti"><par n="di/de"/><i>finitivamenti</i><par n="oji__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dilimitari" a="BonnerDict"><par n="di/de"/><i>limit</i><par n="abbint/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ntirissari"><par n="ø/i"/><i>ntiriss</i><par n="parr/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="justificari"><par n="j/gi/i"/><i>ustific</i><par n="manc/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nnicari"><par n="ø/i/'"/><p><l>ndìc</l><r>nnic</r></p><par n="pàrr/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mprinari"><par n="ø/i"/><i>mprin</i><par n="parr/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="didùciri"><par n="di/de"/><i>dùc</i><par n="ntrudùc/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mmagginari"><par n="ø/i"/><i>mmaggin</i><par n="parr/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="judicari"><par n="j/gi/i"/><i>udic</i><par n="manc/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="juncari"><par n="j/i"/><i>unc</i><par n="manc/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="òffriri"><par n="ò/o"/><i>ffr</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nfurmari"><par n="ø/i"/><p><l>nfòrm</l><r>nfurm</r></p><par n="abbènt/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disputari"><par n="di/de"/><i>sput</i><par n="parr/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opprimiri"><par n="o/u"/><i>pprim</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e><par n="initialisms"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
    <e><par n="ordinales"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
